Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20168-2602
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Credit Report Protection Act:

(1) Consumer reporting agency means any person which, for monetary fees, for dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties and which uses any means or facility of interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing consumer reports;

(2) Credit report has the same meaning as consumer report as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(d);

(3) File, when used in connection with information on any consumer or protected consumer, means all of the information on that consumer or protected consumer recorded and retained by a consumer reporting agency regardless of how the information is stored. File does not include a record;

(4) Protected consumer means an individual who is (a) under sixteen years of age at the time a request for the placement of a security freeze is made or (b) an incapacitated person for whom a guardian or guardian ad litem has been appointed;

(5) Record means a compilation of information that (a) identifies a protected consumer, (b) is created by a consumer reporting agency solely for the purpose of complying with section 8-2603.01, and (c) may not be created or used to consider the protected consumer’s credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living;

(6) Representative means a person who provides to a consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of a protected consumer;

(7) Security freeze means:

(a) A notice placed in a consumer's file as provided in section 8-2603 that prohibits the consumer reporting agency from releasing a credit report, or any other information derived from the file, in connection with the extension of credit or the opening of a new account, without the express authorization of the consumer;

(b) If a consumer reporting agency does not have a file pertaining to a protected consumer, a restriction that:

(i) Is placed on the protected consumer’s record in accordance with section 8-2603.01; and

(ii) Prohibits the consumer reporting agency from releasing the protected consumer’s record except as provided in the Credit Report Protection Act; or

(c) If a consumer reporting agency has a file pertaining to the protected consumer, a restriction that:

(i) Is placed on the protected consumer’s credit report in accordance with section 8-2603.01; and

(ii) Prohibits the consumer reporting agency from releasing the protected consumer’s credit report or any information derived from the protected consumer’s credit report except as provided in section 8-2608.01;

(8) Sufficient proof of authority means documentation that shows a representative has authority to act on behalf of a protected consumer. Sufficient proof of authority includes, but is not limited to, an order issued by a court of law, a lawfully executed and valid power of attorney, or a written notarized statement signed by a representative that expressly describes the authority of the representative to act on behalf of a protected consumer. A representative who is a parent may establish sufficient proof of authority by providing a certified or official copy of the protected consumer’s birth certificate;

(9) Sufficient proof of identification means information or documentation that identifies a consumer, a protected consumer, or a representative of a protected consumer. Sufficient proof of identification includes, but is not limited to, a social security number or a copy of a social security card, a certified or official copy of a birth certificate, a copy of a valid driver's license, or any other government-issued identification; and

(10) Victim of identity theft means a consumer or protected consumer who has a copy of an official police report evidencing that the consumer or protected consumer has alleged to be a victim of identity theft.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB177, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 2.